Tennessee, session 114, HB2174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1306, is amended by deleting
subdivision (c)(3) and substituting:
(3) Is a chancery, circuit, or appellate court judge, or a governor-appointed
judge, and:
(A) Is authorized to carry a handgun pursuant to § 39-17-1351; and
(B) Is vested with judicial powers under § 16-1-101;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 13, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A sitting or retired chancery, circuit, or appellate court judge, or a sitting or retired
governor-appointed judge, is authorized to carry a weapon, including a firearm, in any
location and manner where a law enforcement officer is permitted to carry a firearm
pursuant to § 39-17-1350, if the judge is authorized to carry a handgun pursuant to § 39-
17-1351.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2174
012396
- 1 -